Mississippi, session 2026, SB2038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Establishment of the Our House Residential Multi-Service Center Program.  (1)  For purposes of this act, "program" shall mean the Our House Residential Multi-Service Center Program, which is hereby established as a pilot initiative within the Mississippi Department of Corrections at the CWC in Pike County. (2)  The program shall provide comprehensive services to returning citizens, under community supervision, for at least two (2) years following release from incarceration. SECTION 2.  Program eligibility.  To be eligible for the program, individuals must meet all of the following criteria: (a)  Be unemployed and willing to accept work; (b)  Be homeless or in an "at-risk" environment; (c)  Be willing to contribute to their room, board and transportation based on a graduated model (initially twenty-five percent (25%) to thirty percent (30%), increasing to a maximum of fifty percent (50%).  In addition to the contribution to the expense of the program, each member shall be required to contribute twenty-five percent (25%) into a correctional inmate savings account, which is a secure, facility-managed account that holds an inmate's funds for daily purchases, such as food or hygiene products, and for savings.  Money for savings accounts may come from cash possessed upon arrival, work pay, or deposits from family and friends. Savings accounts may be managed by the facility or by private, third-party services; (d)  Have no convictions for violent crimes, sex crimes or arson; (e)  Be physically and mentally capable of self-care; (f)  Agree to participate in anti-narcotic testing; (g)  Comply with program rules and service plans; and (h)  Not receive or apply for Supplemental Security Income (SSI) or other financial assistance. SECTION 3.  Program structure and services.  (1)  The program shall be delivered through a multidisciplinary treatment team consisting of security staff, community mental health therapists, substance use disorder counselors, probation officers and parole officers. (2)  Program services shall include: (a)  Employment assistance and job development; (b)  Housing support and transportation services; (c)  Food and healthcare provisions; and (d)  Community linkages and aftercare support. (3)  Participants shall be referred to as "members" and will actively contribute to the therapeutic community, fostering ownership of their recovery journey. SECTION 4.  Program phases.  (1)  The program will be structured into phases as follows: (a)  Phase One: Orientation and Assessment. (i)  Duration: Thirty (30) days. (ii)  Focus: Stabilization and adjustment. (iii)  Activities: Initial assessments, attendance in core groups, required journaling, and substance abuse counseling. (b)  Phase Two:  Self-discovery. (i)  Duration: Minimum thirty (30) days. (ii)  Focus:  Goal completion as per individualized service plans. (iii)  Activities: Continued substance abuse/mental health education, participation in community passes with family, and job-readiness preparation. (c)  Phase Three: Workforce Development. (i)  Duration:  Up to ninety (90) days. (ii)  Focus:  Job search and maintaining recovery consistency. (iii)  Activities: Job search completion, budgeting, and community integration. (d)  Phase Four: Transitional/Re-entry. (i)  Duration: Maximum thirty (30) days. (ii)  Focus: Preparation for community reintegration. (iii)  Activities: Continued education, realistic discharge planning, and establishing housing. (e)  Phase Five: Aftercare Services. (i)  Duration: Sixty (60) to ninety (90) days. (ii)  Focus:  Ongoing support post-residential phase. (iii)  Activities: Continued access to services from earlier phases, excluding meals and lodging. (2)  Members shall be required to complete all five (5) phases of the program.  The member shall agree to complete all phases in writing when the member is accepted into the program. SECTION 5.  Expected outcomes.  The program aims to significantly reduce recidivism rates among participants, creating a positive impact on community safety and well-being. The program is projected to avoid significant expenditures each year by facilitating successful re-entry and reducing reliance on state resources. SECTION 6.  Reporting and evaluation.  (1)  In conjunction with the Legislative Budget Office, the Mississippi Department of Corrections shall provide an annual report to the Legislature detailing program outcomes, participant progress, and financial savings achieved through the program. (2)  An independent evaluation of the program's effectiveness shall be conducted every two (2) years to assess its impact on recidivism and overall community reintegration. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.